Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 4. Fees

§ 31-18-401.
Registration fees.

Except as otherwise provided, the following fees shall accompany each application for the registration of a commercial vehicle:

A county registration fee computed in accordance with W.S. 31-3-101(a)(i);

A state registration fee computed as follows:

Commercial vehicles except passenger cars, school buses, house trailers and motorcycles for which the fees shall be computed as provided by W.S. 31-3-101(a)(ii) based on gross vehicle weight pursuant to the following table:

GROSS VEHICLE OR GROSS COMBINATION VEHICLE WEIGHT IN POUNDS FEE 26,000 - or less $198.00 26,001 - 28,000 $214.50 28,001 - 30,000 $231.00 30,001 - 32,000 $247.50 32,001 - 34,000 $275.00 34,001 - 36,000 $302.50 36,001 - 38,000 $330.00 38,001 - 40,000 $357.50 40,001 - 42,000 $385.00 42,001 - 44,000 $412.50 44,001 - 46,000 $440.00 46,001 - 48,000 $467.50 48,001 - 50,000 $495.00 50,001 - 52,000 $522.50 52,001 - 54,000 $550.00 54,001 - 55,000 $563.75 55,001 - 56,000 $577.50 56,001 - 58,000 $605.00 58,001 - 60,000 $632.50 60,001 - 62,000 $660.00 62,001 - 64,000 $687.50 64,001 - 66,000 $715.00 66,001 - 68,000 $742.50 68,001 - 70,000 $770.00 70,001 - 72,000 $797.50 72,001 - 74,000 $825.00 74,001 - 76,000 $852.50 76,001 - 78,000 $880.00 78,001 - 80,000 $907.50

Click to view

For weights over eighty thousand (80,000) pounds, the fee shall be nine hundred forty-eight dollars and seventy-five cents ($948.75) plus twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each additional two thousand (2,000) pounds or fraction thereof.

For vehicles equipped with nonpneumatic tires of an unladen weight in excess of 3,500 pounds, increase the fees prescribed by subparagraph (A) of this paragraph by twenty dollars ($20.00);

Commercial vehicles being operated as a combination of two (2) or more vehicles shall be registered on the gross combined weight and pay fees as prescribed by subparagraph (a)(ii)(A) and paragraph (a)(iii) of this section.

Except as otherwise provided in W.S. 31-18-201(d)(iii), an equalized highway use tax collected by the department in lieu of the county registration fee imposed by paragraph (a)(i) of this section for commercial vehicles or fleets proportionally registered under W.S. 31-18-201(b)(i) and described in W.S. 31-18-201(d)(ii) pursuant to the following table:

VEHICLE OR COMBINATION GROSS VEHICLE WEIGHT IN POUNDS EQUALIZED HIGHWAY USE TAX 26,000 - or less $88.00 26,001 - 28,000 $110.00 28,001 - 30,000 $165.00 30,001 - 32,000 $220.00 32,001 - 34,000 $275.00 34,001 - 36,000 $330.00 36,001 - 38,000 $385.00 38,001 - 40,000 $440.00 40,001 - 42,000 $495.00 42,001 - 44,000 $550.00 44,001 - 46,000 $605.00 46,001 - 48,000 $660.00 48,001 - 50,000 $715.00 50,001 - 52,000 $770.00 52,001 - 54,000 $825.00 54,001 - 56,000 $880.00 56,001 - 58,000 $935.00 58,001 - 60,000 $990.00 60,001 - 62,000 $1,045.00 62,001 - 64,000 $1,100.00 64,001 - 66,000 $1,155.00 66,001 - 68,000 $1,210.00 68,001 - 70,000 $1,265.00 70,001 - 72,000 $1,320.00 72,001 - 74,000 $1,375.00 74,001 - 76,000 $1,430.00 76,001 - 78,000 $1,485.00 78,001 - 80,000 $1,540.00

Click to view

For weights over eighty thousand (80,000) pounds, the tax under this paragraph shall be one thousand six hundred ten dollars ($1,610.00) plus fifty dollars ($50.00) for each additional two thousand (2,000) pounds or fraction thereof.

The fees prescribed by subsection (a) of this section are modified for owners of the following commercial vehicles:

Fees prescribed in subsection (a) of this section for vehicles not previously qualified for operation in this state are reduced by the proportionate share of the year prior to first operation if the vehicles have not been illegally operated on the highways of this state prior to application for registration;

A farmer, rancher, logger or well servicer who owns a commercial vehicle or combination of commercial vehicles operated by him or his employees primarily in agricultural operations, logging operations from the source to the mill, or in the servicing of well field operations and registered with the county treasurer under W.S. 31-18-201(b)(ii) shall pay twenty-five percent (25%) of the fee prescribed in subparagraph (a)(ii)(A) of this section;

An owner of a commercial vehicle or combination of vehicles registered with the county treasurer under W.S. 31-18-201(b)(ii), except for a vehicle owner whose fee is modified pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this subsection, shall pay a percentage of the state registration fee prescribed by subparagraph (a)(ii)(A) of this section as provided in the table below if the owner states under oath on a form prescribed and furnished by the department that the owner will not operate the vehicle or combination of vehicles more than the applicable number of miles stated in the table below on highways in the calendar year of registration:

NUMBER OF MILESOPERATED PERCENTAGE OFSTATE FEE 2,500 miles or less 15% 2,501 to 5,000 miles 20% 5,001 to 10,000 miles 25% 10,001 to 20,000 miles 50% 20,001 to 30,000 miles 75%

Click to view

The department shall prescribe by rule and regulation a means to identify conspicuously the vehicle or combination of vehicles for which a percentage of the state fee is paid at the time of registration pursuant to paragraphs (ii) and (iii) of this subsection. The department shall furnish the means of identification to each county treasurer to be issued at the time of registration. The vehicle owner shall display the means of identification as required by rules and regulations of the department. Failure to display the identification as required shall result in the penalties provided by law for failure to display a license plate;

If an owner of a commercial vehicle or combination of vehicles who pays a percentage of the state fee pursuant to paragraph (iii) of this subsection desires to increase the authorized amount of mileage for which the vehicle or combination of vehicles is registered, he shall pay an additional fee equal to the fee due for the additional amount of miles less the amount of fee paid at the time of registration. If the department determines through an audit, a verification of mileage statements or other means that the owner of a commercial vehicle or combination of vehicles has exceeded the authorized amount of mileage, an additional fee shall be due equal to twice the amount that should have been paid for the actual amount of miles driven less the fee paid pursuant to this paragraph and paragraph (iii) of this subsection;

A vehicle designed and used exclusively for the purpose of removing, towing or transporting wrecked, disabled or replacement vehicles incidental to an accidentally wrecked or disabled vehicle shall be considered a single unit and the fees prescribed by subparagraph (a)(ii)(A) and paragraph (a)(iii) of this section shall be based only on the gross weight of the towing vehicle.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 1; ch. 98, §§ 3, 4(d); 1998, ch. 46, § 1; 2017 ch. 210, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(ii)(A) raised all of the fee amounts by 10% and in the closing language substituted “one thousand six hundred ten dollars ($1,610.00)” for “one thousand four hundred dollars (1,400.00)”; in (a)(iii)(A) raised all of the fee amounts by 10% and in the closing language substituted “one thousand six hundred ten dollars ($1,610.00)” for “one thousand four hundred dollars (1,400.00).”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added “$” preceding the dollar values throughout (a)(ii)(A) and (a)(iii).

§ 31-18-402.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1, related to miscellaneous fees paid by all motor carriers.

§ 31-18-403.
Single trip permits; temporary permits for motion picture industry vehicles, tour buses and mobile drilling rigs.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

and (d) Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 129, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

and (g) Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 129, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

An operator of a mobile drilling rig operated interstate and used in the production of gas, crude petroleum or oil which is constructed as a machine consisting in general of a mast, an engine for power and propulsion, a draw works and a chassis permanently constructed or assembled for the vehicle may obtain a single trip permit from the department in accordance with subsection (a) of this section and W.S. 31-18-201(s). Vehicles making an intrastate move shall be registered in Wyoming. Vehicles already registered in Wyoming need only notify the highway patrol when the vehicle is to be moved on a highway. Compliance with this section exempts the operator from all fees and inspections otherwise required by the commission [department] or its agents.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

37-8-403

; Laws 1985, ch. 207, § 2; 1987, ch. 106, § 1; 1989, ch. 129, §§ 1, 3; 1991, ch. 204, § 1; ch. 241, § 3; 1993, ch. 68, § 4; 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 4, renumbered this section, which was former §

37-8-403

, effective July 1, 1993.

Meaning of “commission.” —

The term “commission,” referred to in the last sentence in subsection (j), apparently originally meant the public service commission. In the context of this chapter, the reference should probably now be to the department.

§ 31-18-404.
Demonstration permits.

through (c) Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 154, § 3.

A vehicle designed primarily for the transportation of property being operated with a load for demonstration purposes shall, in addition to a demo or manufacturer plate, display a demonstration permit indicating under whose authority the vehicle is being operated and the dates of demonstration which shall not exceed ninety-six (96) hours. The permit shall be obtained from the department upon application and payment of the required fee.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; W.S. 1977, §

31-2-211

; Laws 1985, ch. 67, § 1; 1989, ch. 7, § 2; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1993, ch. 48, § 1; ch. 68, § 4; 1997, ch. 154, §§ 2, 3; 1998, ch. 46, §§ 1, 2.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 4, renumbered this section, which was former §

31-2-211

, effective July 1, 1993.

§ 31-18-405.
Collection of fees; audits.

The department shall collect all fees payable under this act and shall adopt and enforce rules and regulations to ensure their collection.

The department may examine and audit the records of all motor carriers to determine compliance with this act. All motor carriers shall keep and maintain records adequate to enable the department to examine and audit the records. The records shall not be destroyed for three (3) years or until the records are examined and audited, whichever occurs first.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

37-8-404

; Laws 1985, ch. 207, § 2; 1987, ch. 70, § 3; 1989, ch. 129, §§ 1, 3; 1993, ch. 68, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

Former subsections (b) and (c) of this section were repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 129, § 3 and former subsections (d) and (e) were repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 70, § 3 and Laws 1989, ch. 129, § 3, respectively.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a) and the first sentence in subsection (b), see § 31-18-101(a)(xix).

§ 31-18-406.
Distribution of fees; refunds.

Fees collected pursuant to W.S. 31-18-401(a)(i) for the registration of Wyoming based commercial vehicles or fleets pursuant to this act shall be distributed monthly to the county in which each vehicle or fleet is principally located and for the registration of non-Wyoming based commercial vehicles or fleets, rental vehicles, utility trailers and rental trucks shall be distributed monthly to the counties in the ratio that the total miles of primary, secondary and interstate highways in each county bears to the total miles of primary, secondary and interstate highways in the state.

Fees collected pursuant to W.S. 31-18-401(a)(i) and subsection (a) of this section shall be distributed by county treasurers in the same proportions and manner as property taxes are distributed.

All other fees shall be credited to the state highway fund except as otherwise provided.

Except as otherwise provided no fees shall be refunded unless paid and collected by mistake.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 31-18-101(a)(xix).

§ 31-18-407.
Emergency response fee; radioactive materials transport permit.

The department of transportation shall collect the emergency response fee assessed under W.S. 37-14-103(a) when it issues a permit for each package of radioactive materials transported through this state. The department shall promulgate rules on issuing and revoking permits that are not inconsistent with federal law. The department shall promulgate rules on quarterly reporting and payment of fees, retention of records and audit requirements. The emergency response fee collected under this subsection pursuant to W.S. 37-14-103(a) shall be deposited as provided in W.S. 37-14-103(a).

As used in this section:

“Radioactive waste” means:

Highway route controlled quantities of radioactive waste as defined in 49 C.F.R. 173.403(1) as amended as of January 1, 1989; and

Nuclear waste being transported to the waste isolation pilot plant in New Mexico, to any facility established pursuant to section 135 of the federal “Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982” as amended, 42 U.S.C. 10101 et seq., to any repository licensed for the permanent deep geological disposal of high-level radioactive waste and spent nuclear fuel, or to any monitored retrievable storage facility established pursuant to section 141 of the federal “Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982” as amended.

“Package” means a container plus its contents that are assembled to assure compliance with the minimum federal packaging requirements for radioactive waste.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 1; 2022 ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, rewrote (a), which read, “In addition to any other fees and taxes provided by law, an emergency response fee of two hundred dollars ($200.00) shall apply to each package of radioactive waste transported through this state in accordance with W.S.

37-14-103

. The department of transportation shall collect this fee based on a permit issued by the department which is not inconsistent with federal law. The department shall promulgate rules on issuing and revoking permits which are not inconsistent with federal law. The department shall promulgate rules on quarterly reporting and payment of fees, retention of records and audit requirements. All emergency response fees shall be deposited in the general fund.”

Nuclear Waste Policy Act. —

Section 135 of the federal Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982, referred to in subsection (b)(i)(B), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 10155. Section 141 of the act, also referred to in subsection (b)(i)(B), appears as 42 U.S.C. § 10161.

§ 31-18-408.
Provision of sales and use tax information; penalty.

Any person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property, at retail, outside of this state, and operating any motor vehicle in this state delivering to the purchaser or the purchaser’s agent in this state any goods sold by the vendor shall, upon entering this state, provide necessary information to the department of revenue for the purposes of the collection of any sales or use tax which may be due under the provisions of W.S.

39-15-101

through

39-16-311

. The department shall provide forms furnished by the department of revenue for the operator to provide the necessary information for the department of revenue to collect any use tax due. The department of revenue shall promulgate necessary rules and regulations to implement this provision pursuant to W.S.

39-11-102

.

Any person knowingly violating the provisions of this section or any rules promulgated under it shall, in addition to any penalty imposed under W.S.

31-18-701

through

31-18-707

, be liable for a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) and not to exceed an amount equal to three (3) times the amount of the sales or use tax due under the provisions of W.S.

39-15-101

through

39-16-311

.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 78, § 1; ch. 209, § 6; 1998, ch. 5, § 2.